Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.175

Service—Development of best practices.

Courts and law enforcement agencies shall adopt rules, protocols, and pattern forms to standardize and implement best practices for service, including mechanisms and verification options for electronic service and electronic returns of service, as well as best practices for efficient transmission of court documents to law enforcement for entry into criminal justice databases and returns of service or property.

[ 2021 c 215 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.